Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1033.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1258HV (1) 91 jm/jh H.F. 1033 Section 1. Section 423.4, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (11) A rural water district organized 3 under chapter 504 as provided in chapter 357A. 4 Sec. 2. Section 423.3, subsection 38, Code 2025, is amended 5 by striking the subsection. 6